Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1567.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Power Plant Host Community Benefit Agreement and Fee Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Affected facility." An electric generating facility with a capacity of at least 10 megawatts. The term shall not include the portion of an electric generating facility that uses alternative energy sources.1234567891011121314151617181920 "Alternative energy sources." Energy derived from:(1) Solar photovoltaic and solar thermal energy.(2) Wind power.(3) Low-impact hydropower.(4) Geothermal energy.(5) Biologically derived methane gas.(6) Fuel cells.(7) Biomass energy.(8) Coal mine methane."Department." The Department of Environmental Protection of the Commonwealth."Governing body." A board of county commissioners, city council, borough or incorporated town council, commissioners of a township of the first class, supervisors of a township of the second class, board of school directors of a school district or their successor forms of government.Section 3. Plan approvals and permits.The department shall not grant to the owner of an affected facility a final plan approval or final operating permit required under section 6.1 of the act of January 8, 1960 (1959 P.L.2119, No.787), known as the Air Pollution Control Act, for a stationary air contamination source that is an electric generating facility with a capacity of at least 10 megawatts unless the owner of the affected facility is in full compliance with section 4.Section 4. Power plant host community benefit agreements.(a) Consultation required.--The owner of an affected facility and the governing body of the municipality, the county and the school district in which the affected facility is proposed to be located, expanded or subject to the renewal of an 20250HB1567PN1867 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 existing permit shall enter into discussions to evaluate the need for and potential terms of a power plant host community benefit agreement.(b) Public hearing.--Prior to negotiating the final terms of a power plant host community benefit agreement, an affected facility and the municipality, county and school district in which the affected facility is located shall, in compliance with section 8, provide a public opportunity for residents of the municipality, county and school district to be heard regarding the need for and potential terms of a power plant host community benefit agreement.(c) Notice of agreement.--If the owner of an affected facility and the municipality in which the affected facility is located enter into a power plant host community benefit agreement, a signed and notarized copy of the agreement shall be transmitted to the department. The department shall transmit the agreement to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(d) Agreement not reached.--If a municipality has approved all necessary zoning and building permits for an affected facility and the owner of the affected facility and the municipality in which the affected facility is located fails to enter into a power plant host community benefit agreement, the following shall apply:(1) The owner of the affected facility and the municipality shall notify the department of the failure to enter into the agreement.(2) The owner of the affected facility remains subject to the provisions of this act, including payment of the required power plant host community impact fees under section 20250HB1567PN1867 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 5.(e) Municipal permits not approved.--If a municipality has not approved all necessary zoning and building permits for an affected facility, the provisions of subsection (d) do not apply.(f) Construction.--Nothing in this act shall be construed to limit the authority of a municipality in which the affected facility is located to withhold approval of any applicable zoning, building or other local permits or approvals required to construct or operate the affected facility in the absence of a power plant host community benefit agreement.Section 5. Power plant host community impact fees.(a) Fees.--The owner of an affected facility that begins operation under a new or expanded permit after the effective date of this act shall, at a minimum, pay the amount of up-front and annual power plant host community impact fees specified in this section in order to operate in this Commonwealth. Nothing in this act shall preclude an affected facility and municipality, county and school district from entering into an agreement that establishes up-front and annual fees in greater amounts and provides for other financial and nonfinancial terms and considerations.(b) Minimum standards for power plant host community impact fees.--(1) The owner of each affected facility shall make an up-front payment of $1,000 per megawatt of electric generating capacity to the municipality in which the affected facility is located. The payment shall be made prior to the generation of any electricity to be supplied to an electric transmission and distribution system. The municipality shall 20250HB1567PN1867 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 use the funds in accordance with section 6.(2) The owner of each affected facility shall make an up-front payment of $200 per megawatt of electric generating capacity to the county in which the affected facility is located. The payment shall be made prior to the generation of any electricity to be supplied to an electric transmission and distribution system. Subject to section 6, the county shall use the money to set up an air quality monitoring program and a water quality monitoring program for the area in the vicinity of the affected facility in conjunction with the municipality and in consultation with the department.(3) The owner of each affected facility shall make an annual payment of $700 per megawatt of electric generating capacity to the municipality in which the affected facility is located. The payment shall be made by December 31 of the first year in which the generation of electricity commences under the terms of a new or expanded permit. For each succeeding year, the annual payment shall be increased by an additional 2% or the percentage increase, if any, in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) as calculated and published by the United States Department of Labor for the most recent 12-month period for which figures have been officially reported, whichever is greater. The municipality shall use the funds in accordance with section 6.(4) The owner of each affected facility shall make an annual payment of $500 per megawatt of electric generating capacity to the school district in which the affected facility is located. The payment shall be made by December 31 of the first year in which the generation of electricity 20250HB1567PN1867 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 commences under the terms of a new or expanded permit. For each succeeding year, the annual payment shall be increased by an additional 2% or the percentage increase, if any, in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) as calculated and published by the United States Department of Labor for the most recent 12-month period for which figures have been officially reported, whichever is greater. The school district shall use the funds in accordance with section 6.(5) The owner of each affected facility shall make an annual payment of $500 per megawatt of electric generating capacity to the county in which the affected facility is located. The payment shall be made by December 31 of the first year in which the generation of electricity commences under the terms of a new or expanded permit. For each succeeding year, the annual payment shall be increased by an additional 2% or the percentage increase, if any, in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) as calculated and published by the United States Department of Labor for the most recent 12-month period for which figures have been officially reported, whichever is greater. The county shall use the funds in accordance with section 6.Section 6. Uses of power plant host community impact fees.(a) Counties and municipalities.--A municipality or county that receives funds under section 5 shall use the funds only for the following purposes associated with hosting a power plant facility within the municipality or county as follows:(1) Construction, reconstruction, maintenance and repair of roadways, bridges and public infrastructure.(2) Water, storm water and sewer systems, including 20250HB1567PN1867 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 construction, reconstruction, maintenance and repair, and the use of green infrastructure to diminish and control storm water.(3) Emergency preparedness and public safety, including law enforcement and fire services, hazardous material response, 911 service, equipment acquisition and other services. At least 10% of the up-front funds received shall be used for the purposes under this paragraph.(4) Environmental programs, including trails, parks and recreation, open space, flood plain management, conservation districts and agricultural preservation.(5) Preservation and reclamation of surface and subsurface waters and water supplies. At least 10% of the up-front and annual funds received shall be used for the purposes under this paragraph.(6) Tax reductions, including homestead exclusions.(7) Projects to increase the availability of safe and affordable housing to residents.(8) Records management, geographic information systems and information technology.(9) The delivery of social services.(10) Judicial services.(11) For deposit into the municipality's or county's capital reserve fund if the funds are used solely for a purpose set forth in this subsection.(12) Programs and projects to provide energy assistance to low-income households.(13) Energy conservation programs.(14) Air and water quality monitoring. At least 10% of the up-front and annual funds received shall be used for the 20250HB1567PN1867 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 purposes under this paragraph.(15) Local or regional planning initiatives under the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.805, No.247), known as the Pennsylvania Municipalities Planning Code.(b) School districts.--A school district that receives funds under section 5 shall use the funds received for general operating expenses to offset expected reductions in property tax revenue associated with hosting a power plant facility within the school district. The school district may also use its funds for the construction or maintenance of parks, trails or other recreational facilities that may be located on school district property or elsewhere in the county hosting the affected facility and for student participation in air and water quality monitoring.(c) Multiple counties.--Payment of up-front and annual power plant host community impact funds to a municipality or school district which is situate in two or more counties shall be allocated based on the ratio which the population of the municipality or school district within each county bears to the total population of the municipality or school district as last officially certified.Section 7. Administrative fees.The owner of an affected facility that begins operation under a new or expanded permit after the effective date of this section shall pay an annual administrative fee of $300 per megawatt of electric generating capacity to the department. The first payment shall be made within one month of the commencement of generating electricity under the terms of a new or expanded permit. Payments for the following year and each successive year shall be made by June 30. The department shall use the 20250HB1567PN1867 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 administrative fee to cover its expenses in administering this act and for developing air and water quality monitoring programs in consultation with the municipality and county hosting the affected facility.Section 8. Power plant host community public participation requirements.(a) Requirements for owners of affected facilities.--An owner of an affected facility seeking a final plan approval or final permit approval from the department as described in section 3 shall submit a public participation plan to the department on a form prescribed by the department. The department shall either approve the plan or request changes in the plan.(b) Contents of public participation plan.--The public participation plan shall provide for the following:(1) The opportunity for residents of the municipality, county and school district in which the affected facility is located to participate in the process by which the department approves a plan or permit, including the opportunity to ask questions in a public meeting or forum.(2) Identification of proposed dates for at least one public meeting or forum.(3) The means by which the public meeting or forum shall be advertised and publicized.(c) Requirements for host municipalities, counties and school districts.--(1) The municipality, county and school district in which the affected facility is proposed to be located, expanded or subject to the renewal of an existing permit, shall each hold at least one separate public meeting or forum 20250HB1567PN1867 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to evaluate the need for and potential terms of a power plant host community benefit agreement. The public meeting or forum shall provide members of the public the opportunity to ask questions.(2) The municipality, county and school district holding the public meeting or forum shall advertise the meeting in public newspapers and online and take reasonable steps to publicize and make residents of the municipality, county and school district aware of the meeting.Section 9. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1567PN1867 - 10 - 1234567891011